North Dakota statutes. TITLE 50 Public Welfare
CHAPTER 50-27 Children’s Trust Fund

50-27-01.
Creation and administration of children’s trust fund. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special fund known as the children’s trust fund. The children and family services division of the department of human services shall administer the fund. All moneys designated for the fund from whatever source derived must be deposited with the state treasurer in the children’s trust fund. The state treasurer shall invest such funds in interest-bearing accounts as is designated by the children and family services division, and the interest earned must be deposited in the children’s trust fund. The children and family services division shall designate the administrator of child protective services as executive secretary of the children’s trust fund.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 539, § 1; 1991, ch. 508, § 7; 1995, ch. 458, § 5.

50-27-01.
Creation and administration of children’s trust fund. [Effective September 1, 2022]

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special fund known as the children’s trust fund. The children and family services division of the department of health and human services shall administer the fund. All moneys designated for the fund from whatever source derived must be deposited with the state treasurer in the children’s trust fund. The state treasurer shall invest such funds in interest-bearing accounts as is designated by the children and family services division, and the interest earned must be deposited in the children’s trust fund. The children and family services division shall designate the administrator of child protective services as executive secretary of the children’s trust fund.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 539, § 1; 1991, ch. 508, § 7; 1995, ch. 458, § 5; 2021, ch. 352, § 472, effective September 1, 2022.

50-27-02.
Expenditures from fund — Definition of child abuse prevention.

Expenditures from the children’s trust fund may only be for the purposes of administering and maintaining the fund, aiding in the prevention of child abuse and neglect as defined in chapter 50-25.1, and developing child abuse prevention programs. For purposes of this chapter, “prevention of child abuse and neglect” means those activities which seek to:

Anticipate the occurrence of and act to prevent child abuse and neglect.

Provide public information and education as to the means by which child abuse and neglect may be identified, prevented, remedied, or alleviated.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 539, § 2.

50-27-03.
Authority of the children and family services division of the department of human services. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The children and family services division may:

Create such advisory committees as may be deemed necessary to assure public involvement in the planning, development, and administration of the children’s trust fund.

Hire or arrange for appropriate staff, as deemed necessary, to administer and maintain properly the children’s trust fund.

Develop, implement, and periodically review a written plan to be used in administering the funds expended from and retained in the children’s trust fund. The written plan must include the types of activities to be funded, the nature of organizations preferred for funding, the criteria for eligible fund applicants, and the mechanisms for the monitoring and evaluating of funded activities.

Award grants from the children’s trust fund in accordance with this chapter and any rules that have been adopted.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 539, § 3; 1989, ch. 333, § 17; 1991, ch. 508, § 8; 1995, ch. 458, § 6.

50-27-03.
Authority of the children and family services division of the department of health and human services. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The children and family services division may:

Create such advisory committees as may be deemed necessary to assure public involvement in the planning, development, and administration of the children’s trust fund.

Hire or arrange for appropriate staff, as deemed necessary, to administer and maintain properly the children’s trust fund.

Develop, implement, and periodically review a written plan to be used in administering the funds expended from and retained in the children’s trust fund. The written plan must include the types of activities to be funded, the nature of organizations preferred for funding, the criteria for eligible fund applicants, and the mechanisms for the monitoring and evaluating of funded activities.

Award grants from the children’s trust fund in accordance with this chapter and any rules that have been adopted.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 539, § 3; 1989, ch. 333, § 17; 1991, ch. 508, § 8; 1995, ch. 458, § 6; 2021, ch. 352, § 473, effective September 1, 2022.